Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-1908
Transnational repression; Nebraska State Patrol; website; powers; reports to the Legislature.

(1) The Nebraska State Patrol may develop a centralized and convenient website that allows members of the public to report instances of transnational repression. The website may include options for reporting in languages commonly spoken in Nebraska, including particularly languages of communities affected more frequently by transnational repression.

(2) The patrol may conduct a public awareness campaign to inform the public:

(a) How to identify and report instances of transnational repression;

(b) How to use the website created under this section; and

(c) What tools and remedies are available for victims of transnational repression.

(3) The patrol may electronically submit reports to the Legislature concerning complaints received on the website, outcomes of such complaints, and any instances of interference by foreign principals in the reporting process.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 21.